Utah statutes.
31A-15-101.   Purposes.
It is the purpose of this chapter to:
(1)  prevent evasion by unauthorized insurers of the regulatory and tax laws
of Utah and protect Utah and its residents against loss from that type of
evasion;
(2)  subject unauthorized insurers and other persons doing an insurance
business in Utah to the jurisdiction of the Utah commissioner and courts;
(3)  protect authorized insurers from unfair competition by unauthorized
insurers; and
(4)  provide an orderly method, under reasonable and practical safeguards, for
procuring insurance from unauthorized insurers.
